Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0497.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 14b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 408 to 420 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 408.1035(5) Person H MIOSHA violation causing employee death 1 Person G MIOSHA violation causing employee death ? subsequent offense 3 408.1035a(5) Person H MIOSHA violation causing employee death 1 Person G MIOSHA violation causing employee death ? subsequent offense 3 409.122(2) Person G Employment of children during certain hours ? second offense 2 Person E Employment of children during certain hours ? third or subsequent offense 10 409.122(3) 409.122(2) Person D Employment of children in child sexually abusive activity 20 409.122(3) Person E Employment of children during certain hours involving death or great bodily harm 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 496 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.